Illinois, session 104th, HB5611.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Education Property Tax Relief Fund. 8    Section 10. The Budget Stabilization Act is amended by 9changing Sections 20 and 25 as follows: 10    (30 ILCS 122/20)11    (Text of Section WITHOUT the changes made by P.A. 98-599, 12which has been held unconstitutional)13    Sec. 20. Pension Stabilization Fund.14    (a) The Pension Stabilization Fund is hereby created as a 15special fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be 16used for the sole purpose of making payments to the designated 17retirement systems as provided in Section 25. 18    (b) For each fiscal year when the General Assembly's 19appropriations and transfers or diversions as required by law 20from general funds do not exceed 99% of the estimated general 21funds revenues pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 10, the   HB5611- 2 -LRB104 20416 HLH 33880 b1Comptroller shall transfer from the General Revenue Fund as 2provided by this Section a total amount equal to 0.5% of the 3estimated general funds revenues to the Pension Stabilization 4Fund.5    (c) For each fiscal year when the General Assembly's 6appropriations and transfers or diversions as required by law 7from general funds do not exceed 98% of the estimated general 8funds revenues pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 10, the 9Comptroller shall transfer from the General Revenue Fund as 10provided by this Section a total amount equal to 1.0% of the 11estimated general funds revenues to the Pension Stabilization 12Fund.13    (c-5) In addition to any other transfers that may be 14provided by law, the Comptroller shall transfer from the 15General Revenue Fund to the Pension Stabilization Fund the 16amount set forth as follows for each of the specified fiscal 17years:18Fiscal YearAmount192030-2033$300,000,000202034-Completion$850,000,00021    (c-10) The transfers made beginning in State fiscal year 222030 pursuant to subsection (c-5) of this Section shall 23terminate at the end of State fiscal year 2045 or when each of 24the designated retirement systems, as defined in Section 25, 25has achieved 100% funding, whichever occurs first. 26    (d) The Comptroller shall transfer 1/12 of the total   HB5611- 3 -LRB104 20416 HLH 33880 b1amount to be transferred each fiscal year under this Section 2into the Pension Stabilization Fund on the first day of each 3month of that fiscal year or as soon thereafter as possible; 4except that the final transfer of the fiscal year shall be made 5as soon as practical after the August 31 following the end of 6the fiscal year.7    Before the final transfer for a fiscal year is made, the 8Comptroller shall reconcile the estimated general funds 9revenues used in calculating the other transfers under this 10Section for that fiscal year with the actual general funds 11revenues for that fiscal year. The final transfer for the 12fiscal year shall be adjusted so that the total amount 13transferred under this Section for that fiscal year is equal 14to the percentage specified in subsection (b) or (c) of this 15Section, whichever is applicable, of the actual general funds 16revenues for that fiscal year. The actual general funds 17revenues for the fiscal year shall be calculated in a manner 18consistent with subsection (c) of Section 10 of this Act. 19(Source: P.A. 94-839, eff. 6-6-06.) 20    (30 ILCS 122/25)21    (Text of Section WITHOUT the changes made by P.A. 98-599, 22which has been held unconstitutional)23    Sec. 25. Transfers from the Pension Stabilization Fund.24    (a) As used in this Section, "designated retirement 25systems" means:  HB5611- 4 -LRB104 20416 HLH 33880 b1        (1) the State Employees' Retirement System of 2    Illinois;3        (2) the Teachers' Retirement System of the State of 4    Illinois;5        (3) the State Universities Retirement System;6        (4) the Judges Retirement System of Illinois; and7        (5) the General Assembly Retirement System.8    (b) As soon as may be practical after any money is 9deposited into the Pension Stabilization Fund, the State 10Comptroller shall apportion the deposited amount among the 11designated retirement systems and the State Comptroller and 12State Treasurer shall pay the apportioned amounts to the 13designated retirement systems. The amount deposited shall be 14apportioned among the designated retirement systems in the 15same proportion as their respective portions of the total 16actuarial reserve deficiency of the designated retirement 17systems, as most recently determined by the Governor's Office 18of Management and Budget. Amounts received by a designated 19retirement system under this Section shall be used for funding 20the unfunded liabilities of the retirement system. Payments 21under this Section are authorized by the continuing 22appropriation under Section 1.7 of the State Pension Funds 23Continuing Appropriation Act.24    (c) At the request of the State Comptroller, the 25Governor's Office of Management and Budget shall determine the 26individual and total actuarial reserve deficiencies of the   HB5611- 5 -LRB104 20416 HLH 33880 b1designated retirement systems. For this purpose, the 2Governor's Office of Management and Budget shall consider the 3latest available audit and actuarial reports of each of the 4retirement systems and the relevant reports and statistics of 5the Public Pension Division of the Department of Financial and 6Professional Regulation.7    (d) Payments to the designated retirement systems under 8this Section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any 9State contributions required under Section 2-124, 14-131, 1015-155, 16-158, or 18-131 of the Illinois Pension Code.11    Payments to the designated retirement systems under 12subsections (c-5) and (c-10) of Section 20 received after the 13effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 14Assembly, and any investment earnings attributable to such 15payments, do not reduce and do not constitute payment of any 16portion of the required State contribution under Article 2, 1714, 15, 16, or 18 of the Illinois Pension Code in the current 18fiscal year. Such amounts shall not reduce, and shall not be 19included in the calculation of, the required State 20contribution under Article 2, 14, 15, 16, or 18 of the Illinois 21Pension Code in any future fiscal year, until the designated 22retirement system has reached a 100% funding ratio. Such 23payments may be invested in the same manner as other assets of 24the designated retirement system and shall be used in the 25calculation of the system's funding ratio for the purposes of 26this Section and Section 20 of this Act. Payments under this   HB5611- 6 -LRB104 20416 HLH 33880 b1Section may be used for any associated administrative costs. 2(Source: P.A. 94-839, eff. 6-6-06.) 3    Section 15. The School Code is amended by adding Section 42-3.214 as follows: 5    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.214 new)6    Sec. 2-3.214. School district property tax relief grant 7program.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Adjusted maximum aggregate property tax extension" means 10the highest aggregate property tax extension that a school 11district is authorized by law to levy, without regard to this 12Section, for the taxable year for which the adjusted maximum 13aggregate property tax extension is calculated, minus the 14grant amount received by the school district for the fiscal 15year that ends during the taxable year for which the adjusted 16maximum aggregate property tax extension is calculated.17    "Aggregate property tax extension" means the annual 18corporate extension for the school district and those special 19purpose extensions that are made annually for a school 20district.21    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which 22property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are levied.23    (b) For State fiscal year 2030 and each State fiscal year 24thereafter, the State Board of Education shall establish and   HB5611- 7 -LRB104 20416 HLH 33880 b1administer a program to award property tax relief grants to 2school districts in this State. In exchange for receiving a 3grant under this Section, a school district's maximum 4aggregate property tax extension for the taxable year that 5begins on January 1 of the fiscal year for which the grant is 6awarded may not exceed its adjusted maximum aggregate property 7tax extension for that taxable year. Grants shall be awarded 8from moneys appropriated for that purpose from the Education 9Property Tax Relief Fund created in subsection (c). Moneys 10awarded to school districts under this Section shall be 11distributed pro rata on a per pupil average daily attendance 12basis, as reported in the school district report card for the 13immediately preceding school year under Section 10-17a.14    (c) The Education Property Tax Relief Fund is created as a 15special fund in the State treasury. By September 1, 2030, and 16by September 1 of each year thereafter, the Governor's Office 17of Management and Budget shall certify to the State 18Comptroller and the State Treasurer an amount equal to 19$300,000,000 in fiscal years 2030-2033 and $850,000,000 in 20fiscal year 2034 and every fiscal year thereafter. Upon 21receiving the certified amount from the Governor's Office of 22Management and Budget, the State Comptroller shall order 23transferred and the State Treasurer shall transfer the 24certified amount from the General Revenue Fund to the 25Education Property Tax Relief Fund. Any unexpended amounts 26remaining in the Education Property Tax Relief Fund on the   HB5611- 8 -LRB104 20416 HLH 33880 b1last day of the fiscal year shall be transferred from the 2Education Property Tax Relief Fund to the General Revenue 3Fund.